Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.467

License suspension—Noncompliance with support order—Reissuance.

In the case of suspension for failure to comply with a support order under chapter 74.20A RCW or a *residential or visitation order under chapter 26.09 RCW, if the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of a license shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the individual is in compliance with the order.

[ 1997 c 58 s 820.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 1997 c 58 s 886 requiring a court to order certification of noncompliance with residential provisions of a court-ordered parenting plan was vetoed. Provisions ordering the department of social and health services to certify a responsible parent based on a court order to certify for noncompliance with residential provisions of a parenting plan were vetoed. See RCW 74.20A.320.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.